District of Columbia statutes.
25-117

Brew pub permit requirements and qualifications.

(a)

A brew pub permit shall authorize the licensee to brew malt beverages at one location for consumption at a licensed restaurant, tavern, multipurpose facility, hotel, or nightclub and for sale to licensed wholesalers for the purpose of resale to other licensees. The location used to brew malt beverages shall be on or immediately adjacent to the restaurant, tavern, multipurpose facility, hotel, or nightclub licensed to the brew pub owner in accordance with subsection (b) of this section.

(a-1)

A brew pub permit shall authorize the licensee to sell beer in growlers.

(b)

A brew pub permit shall be issued only to the licensee under an on-premises restaurant or tavern retailer’s license, class C or D, or in conjunction with the issuance of an on-premises restaurant or tavern retailer’s license, class C or D.

(c)

A brew pub permit shall be cancelled or revoked if:

(1)

The restaurant, tavern, multipurpose facility, hotel, or nightclub ceases to be operated as a restaurant or tavern; or

(2)

The licensee’s on-premises retailer license, class C or D, is revoked or cancelled.

(d)

A brew pub permit shall be automatically suspended whenever and for the same period of time that the licensee’s retailer’s license, class C or D, is suspended.

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 324, ch. 4, § 11
Apr. 30, 1934, 48 Stat. 654, ch. 181, § 1
June 18, 1934, 48 Stat. 997, ch. 588
July 2, 1935, 49 Stat. 444, ch. 359
Aug. 27, 1935, 49 Stat. 898, 899, ch. 756, §§ 3-7
June 15, 1938, 52 Stat. 691, ch. 396, §§ 1, 2
May 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 133, ch. 146, title V, § 501
June 29, 1953, 67 Stat. 103, ch. 159, § 404(d)
May 31, 1962, 76 Stat. 89, Pub. L. 87-470, § 1
Dec. 8, 1970, 84 Stat. 1393, Pub. L. 91-535, § 2
Apr. 6, 1977, D.C. Law 1-102, § 2(a), (b), 23 DCR 8732
Apr. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-73, § 3, 24 DCR 7066
Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-157, § 2(b), 27 DCR 5117
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-157, §§ 6, 15, 29 DCR 3617
Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-204, § 2, 30 DCR 185
Aug. 2, 1983, D.C. Law, 5-16, § 3, 30 DCR 3193
Mar. 8, 1984, D.C. Law 5-51, § 2(a), 30 DCR 5927
Mar. 7, 1987, D.C. Law 6-217, § 5, 34 DCR 907
Aug. 17, 1991, D.C. Law 9-40, § 2(b), 38 DCR 4974
May 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-122, § 2(e), 41 DCR 1658
Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-202, § 2(b), 45 DCR 8412
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(q)(1), 46 DCR 3142
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-310, § 2(f), 60 DCR 3410
1981 Ed., § 25-117.
1973 Ed., § 25-111.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-310 substituted “restaurant, tavern, multipurpose facility, hotel, or nightclub” for “restaurant or tavern” in (a), (b), and (c)(1); added (a-1); and substituted “cancelled or revoked” for “void” in the introductory language of (c).
For temporary amendment of (a)-(c) and addition of (a-1), see § 2(f) of the Omnibus Alcoholic Beverage Regulation Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-597, January 14, 2013, 60 DCR 1001).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(f) of the Omnibus Alcoholic Beverage Regulation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-52, April 22, 2013, 60 DCR 6372, 20 DCSTAT 1388).